Utah statutes.
20A-5-102.   Voting instructions.

(1)  Each election officer shall:

(a)  print instruction cards for voters;

(b)  ensure that the cards are printed in English in large clear type; and

(c)  ensure that the cards instruct voters:

(i)  about how to obtain ballots for voting;

(ii)  about special political party affiliation requirements for voting in the Western States Presidential Primary or in a regular primary election;

(iii)  about how to prepare ballots for deposit in the ballot box;

(iv)  about how to record write-in votes;

(v)  about how to obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake;

(vi)  about how to obtain assistance in marking ballots;

(vii)  about obtaining a new ballot if the voter's ballot is defaced;

(viii)  that identification marks or the spoiling or defacing of a ballot will make it invalid;

(ix)  about how to obtain and vote a provisional ballot;

(x)  about whom to contact to report election fraud;

(xi)  about applicable federal and state laws regarding:

(A)  voting rights and the appropriate official to contact if the voter alleges his rights have been violated; and

(B)  prohibitions on acts of fraud and misrepresentation;

(xii)  about procedures governing mail-in registrants and first-time voters; and

(xiii)  about the date of the election and the hours that the polls are open on election day.

(2)  Each election officer shall:

(a)  provide the election judges of each voting precinct with sufficient instruction cards to instruct voters in the preparation of their ballots;

(b)  direct the election judges to post:

(i) general voting instructions in each voting booth; and

(ii)  at least three instruction cards and at least one sample ballot elsewhere in and about the polling place.

